Hawaii, session 2026, GM1239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that hands-on, real-world
experience is a critical component of higher education,
particularly in fields such as hospitality, agriculture,
culinary arts, and business management. To provide this
essential training, the university of Hawaii must be able to
operate teaching laboratories, which are facilities that
function as active businesses to give students practical
experience in their chosen careers.
The legislature further finds that these educational
laboratories often mimic commercial enterprises in their
operations, such as teaching hotels or culinary centers.
Consequently, these facilities can face regulatory hurdles at
the county level, where zoning codes and requirements for
special use permits, designed for commercial entities, are
applied to educational institutions. For example, the
university of Hawaii Maui college's hospitality academy seeks to
operate a limited number of guest rooms for student training but
2026-3340 HB2171 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
faces zoning challenges regarding the collection of fees and the
requirement for special use permits.
The legislature determines that the educational mission of
the university of Hawaii is a matter of statewide concern
pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State
Constitution. Subjecting university educational programs to
varying county zoning ordinances and discretionary permit
processes hinders the development of necessary workforce
training programs.
The purpose of this Act is to authorize the university of
Hawaii to engage in enterprise-related activities that have an
educational nexus on its campuses statewide, notwithstanding
county zoning laws or requirements for special use permits.
SECTION 2. Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§304A- Enterprise-related activities; educational
nexus; exemption front county regulation. (a) Notwithstanding
any law, county ordinance, or county zoning regulation to the
contrary, the university of Hawaii may engage in enterprise-
2026-3340 HB2171 CDl HMSO

wiiiiiiiMniiiiiniiiiii

Page 3 H.B. NO 2171
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
related activities on any lands owned, leased, or otherwise
controlled by the university.
(b) Any revenue generated by enterprise-related activities
authorized under this section shall be retained by the
university to defray costs, maintain facilities, or support
student scholarships.
(c) Enterprise-related activities authorized under this
section shall be considered a permitted use on all lands
designated for university purposes. To facilitate these
educational operations, the university shall be exempt from
county zoning ordinances and requirements for special use
permits, conditional use permits, or other county land use
approvals.
(d) Nothing in this section shall exempt the university or
its facilities from mandatory compliance with technical and
safety codes. Facilities hosting enterprise-related activities
shall remain strictly subject to:
(1) Applicable state or county building codes;
(2) The state fire code;
(3) Department of health sanitation and food safety
standards;
2026-3340 HB2171 CDl HMSO

■IIHIIIIIIIUIIIIIilllill

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Accessibility requirements overseen by the disability
and communications access board; and
(5) Where applicable, general excise and transient
accommodations taxes.
(e) For purposes of this section, "enterprise-related
activities" means structured, program-based operations conducted
by the university on lands owned, leased, or otherwise
controlled by the university that:
(1) Are directly and integrally related to an academic,
career and technical education, workforce development,
or research program offered by the university;
(2) Provide supervised, hands-on training or applied
learning opportunities in a real-world setting,
including but not limited to the production of goods,
provision of services, or operation of facilities that
simulate or replicate industry conditions;
(3) Require active and ongoing student participation as
part of a credit-bearing course, certificate program,
or formally administered training program;
2026-3340 HB2171 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Are operated primarily for instructional, training, or
research purposes, and not as a primary commercial
enterprise; and
(5) May generate incidental revenue through the sale of
goods or services; provided that any such revenue is
secondary to and supportive of the educational
mission.
"Enterprise-related activities" may include but shall not be
limited to teaching laboratories, training facilities, clinics,
production environments, incubators, or other applied learning
settings designated by the board of regents that meet the
requirements of this section."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3340 HB2171 CDl HMSO

iiiiiiiiiniiiiniiH

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2171, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2171, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
107-26